apertium-en-gl/apertium-en-gl.en.metadix
    <pardef n="broad/__adj">
    <e c="CP: adjectives that may form the comparative and superlative forms either adding -er and -est or with more and the most (LR)">
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>er</l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>est</l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="drab/__adj">
    <e c="CP: adjectives that may form the comparative and superlative forms either with more and the most or doubling the final consonant and adding -r and -st (LR) respectively ">
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ber</l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>best</l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="flat/__adj">
    <e c="CP: adjectives that may form the comparative and superlative forms either with more and the most or doubling the final consonant and adding -r and -st (LR) respectively ">
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ter</l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>test</l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="fun/__adj">
    <e c="CP: adjectives that may form the comparative and superlative forms either doubling the final consonant and adding -er and -est or directly adding -er and -est respectively">
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ner</l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nest</l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>er</l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>est</l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="glum/__adj">
    <e c="CP: adjectives that may form the comparative and superlative forms either with more and the most or doubling the final consonant and adding -r and -st (LR) respectively ">
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>mer</l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>mest</l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="up/__adj">
    <e c="CP: adjectives that finish in -p and add -per and -pest to form the comparative and superlative forms">
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>per</l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>pest</l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mine__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pos"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="maybe__adv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="adv"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="very__preadv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="preadv"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="where__adv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="and__cnjcoo">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="after__cnjadv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="cnjadv"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="that__cnjsub">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="the__det">
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="a__det">
    <e c="aquí caldrà afegir-hi la marca de postgeneració">
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>n</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="another__det">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="other__det">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="several__det">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="her__det">
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="th/is__det">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>is</l> 
        <r>is<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ese</l> 
        <r>is<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="th/at__det">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>at</l> 
        <r>at<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ose</l> 
        <r>at<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="second__det">
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL" c="trampa per a traduir 'primero' quan és adj i no det ('primer')">
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="adj"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="many__det">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="much__det">
    <e c="MG: treure i substituir">
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="enough__det">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

	<e r="RL" lm="a">
      <p>
        <l><a/>a</l> 
        <r>a</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="a__det"/> 
    </e>
<e r="LR" lm="a">
        <i>a</i> 
        <par n="a__det"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="both">
        <i>both</i> 
        <par n="several__det"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="either">
        <i>either</i> 
        <par n="another__det"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="its">
        <i>its</i> 
        <par n="her__det"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="little">
        <i>little</i> 
        <par n="much__det"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="most">
        <i>most</i> 
        <par n="enough__det"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="much">
        <i>much</i> 
        <par n="much__det"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="no">
        <i>no</i> 
        <par n="another__det"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="other">
        <i>other</i> 
        <par n="other__det"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="our">
        <i>our</i> 
        <par n="her__det"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="second">
        <i>second</i> 
        <par n="second__det"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="several">
        <i>several</i> 
        <par n="several__det"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="this">
        <i>th</i> 
        <par n="th/is__det"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="that">
        <i>th</i> 
        <par n="th/at__det"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="the">
        <i>the</i> 
        <par n="the__det"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="the same">
        <i>the<b/>same</i> 
        <par n="other__det"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="too much">
        <i>too<b/>much</i> 
        <par n="much__det"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="various">
        <i>various</i> 
        <par n="several__det"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="your">
        <i>your</i> 
        <par n="her__det"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="last"><i>last</i><par n="second__det"/></e>
<e lm="seventh"><i>seventh</i><par n="second__det"/></e>
<e lm="fewer"><i>fewer</i><par n="many__det"/></e>
<e lm="few"><i>few</i><par n="many__det"/></e>
<e lm="the most"><i>the<b/>most</i><par n="enough__det"/></e>
<e lm="so many"><i>so<b/>many</i><par n="many__det"/></e>
<e lm="many"><i>many</i><par n="many__det"/></e>
<e lm="lots of"><i>lots<b/>of</i><par n="enough__det"/></e>
<e lm="such a"><i>such a</i><par n="another__det"/></e>
<e lm="such"><i>such</i><par n="other__det"/></e>
<e lm="broad">
        <i>broad</i> 
        <par n="broad/__adj"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="flat">
        <i>flat</i> 
        <par n="flat/__adj"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="fun">
        <i>fun</i> 
        <par n="fun/__adj"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="his">
        <i>his</i> 
        <par n="mine__adj"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="mine">
        <i>mine</i> 
        <par n="mine__adj"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="ours">
        <i>ours</i> 
        <par n="mine__adj"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="theirs">
        <i>theirs</i> 
        <par n="mine__adj"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="how">
      <i>how</i> 
      <par n="very__preadv"/> 
   </e>
<e lm="more">
      <i>more</i> 
      <par n="very__preadv"/> 
   </e>
<e lm="pretty">
      <i>pretty</i> 
      <par n="very__preadv"/> 
   </e>
<e lm="really">
      <i>really</i> 
      <par n="very__preadv"/> 
   </e>
<e lm="calmly">
	   <i>calmly</i> 
	   <par n="maybe__adv"/> 
   </e>
<e lm="formally">
      <i>formally</i> 
      <par n="maybe__adv"/> 
   </e>
<e lm="on the one hand">
      <i>on<b/>the<b/>one<b/>hand</i> 
      <par n="maybe__adv"/> 
   </e>
<e lm="until no more is needed nor desired">
      <i>until<b/>no<b/>more<b/>is<b/>needed<b/>nor<b/>desired</i> 
      <par n="maybe__adv"/> 
   </e>
<e lm="when">
      <i>when</i> 
      <par n="where__adv"/> 
   </e>
<e lm="whenever">
	   <i>whenever</i> 
	   <par n="where__adv"/> 
   </e>
<e lm="why">
      <i>why</i> 
      <par n="where__adv"/> 
   </e>
<e lm="but">
        <i>but</i> 
        <par n="and__cnjcoo"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="either">
        <i>either</i> 
        <par n="and__cnjcoo"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="than">
        <i>than</i> 
        <par n="and__cnjcoo"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="nevertheless">
	    <i>nevertheless</i> 
	    <par n="after__cnjadv"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="so that">
        <i>so<b/>that</i> 
        <par n="after__cnjadv"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="whereas">
        <i>whereas</i> 
        <par n="after__cnjadv"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="that">
        <i>that</i> 
        <par n="that__cnjsub"/> 
    </e>
